Utah statutes.
39-1-54.   Privilege from arrest or citation -- Exceptions.

(1)  The members of the National Guard are privileged from arrest or citation by civil authorities during their attendance at drill parades or encampments, or in going to and returning from any of these activities.

(2)  This privilege does not extend to arrest or citation for:

(a)  treason;

(b)  any felony;

(c)  breach of the peace;

(d)  operation of a vehicle in a reckless manner or while under the influence of any drug or alcohol; or

(e)  offenses which under state law are class A misdemeanors or greater.

